New York, session 2025-2026, S8895.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 120.05 of the penal law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 15 to read as follows: 3 15. With the intent to cause physical injury to a specific retired 4 police officer, as police officer is defined pursuant to subdivision 5 thirty-four of section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law, due to a 6 belief regarding such retired police officer's involvement in a previous 7 arrest of such person while on active duty, such person causes such 8 injury to such retired police officer or a third person. 9 § 2. Subdivision 4 of section 120.10 of the penal law, as amended by 10 chapter 791 of the laws of 1967, is amended and a new subdivision 5 is 11 added to read as follows: 12 4. In the course of and in furtherance of the commission or attempted 13 commission of a felony or of immediate flight therefrom, [he] such 14 person, or another participant if there be any, causes serious physical 15 injury to a person other than one of the participants[.] ; or 16 5. With intent to cause serious physical injury to a specific retired 17 police officer, as police officer is defined pursuant to subdivision 18 thirty-four of section 1.20 of the criminal procedure law, due to a 19 belief regarding such retired police officer's involvement in a previous 20 arrest of such person while on active duty, such person causes such 21 injury to such retired police officer or to a third person. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 23 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14449-01-6